Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201581-3420
Practice of architecture, defined.

(1) Practice of architecture means providing or offering to provide design services in connection with the construction, enlargement, or alteration of a building or group of buildings and the space within and surrounding the buildings. The services may include, but not be limited to, planning, providing studies, designs, drawings, specifications, and other technical submissions, and administering construction contracts. The practice of architecture does not include the practice of engineering.

(2) A person shall be construed to practice architecture, within the meaning and intent of the Engineers and Architects Regulation Act, if he or she:

(a) Practices the profession of architecture or holds himself or herself out as able and entitled to practice architecture;

(b) By verbal claim, sign, advertisement, letterhead, or card or in any other way, represents himself or herself to be an architect; or

(c) Through the use of some other title, implies that he or she is an architect or licensed under the Engineers and Architects Regulation Act.

Laws 1997, LB 622, § 20;

Laws 2015, LB23, § 18.